Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1802
Legislative findings.

(1) The Legislature finds that:

(a) The unregulated practice of medical nutrition therapy can clearly harm or endanger the health, safety, and welfare of the public;

(b) The public can reasonably be expected to benefit from an assurance of initial and continuing professional ability; and

(c) The public cannot be effectively protected by a less cost-effective means than state regulation of the practice of medical nutrition therapy. The Legislature also finds that dietitians and nutritionists must exercise independent judgment and that professional education, training, and experience are required to make such judgment.

(2) The Legislature further finds that the practice of medical nutrition therapy in the State of Nebraska is not sufficiently regulated for the protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the public. It declares that this is a matter of statewide concern and it shall be the policy of the State of Nebraska to promote high standards of professional performance by those persons representing themselves as licensed dietitian nutritionists and licensed nutritionists.

Laws 1988, LB 557, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,285;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 624;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 25.